Washington statutes.
RCW 39.42.040

Disposition of proceeds from sale of bonds.

The proceeds of the sale of any bonds shall be used solely for the purposes, including any expense incurred in connection with the issuance and sale of such bonds, specified in the general statute or special act authorizing the issuance of such bonds.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 184 s 4.]